Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-816
Legislative findings;
State Committee on Problem Gambling; created; members; duties; division; duties;
joint report.

(1) The Legislature finds that the main sources
of funding for the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund are the Charitable
Gaming Operations Fund as provided in section 9-1,101 and the State Lottery
Operation Trust Fund as provided in section 9-812 and Article III, section
24, of the Constitution of Nebraska. It is the intent of the Legislature that
the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund be used primarily for counseling and
treatment services for problem gamblers and their families who are residents
of Nebraska.

(2) The State Committee on Problem Gambling is created. Members of the
committee shall have a demonstrated interest and commitment and specialized
knowledge, experience, or expertise relating to problem gambling in the State
of Nebraska. The committee shall consist of twelve members appointed by the
Governor and shall include at least three consumers of problem gambling services.
The committee shall appoint one of its members as chairperson of the committee
and other officers as it deems appropriate. The committee shall conduct regular
meetings and shall meet upon the call of the chairperson or a majority of
its members to conduct its official business.

(3) The committee shall develop and recommend to the division guidelines
and standards for the distribution and disbursement of money in the Compulsive
Gamblers Assistance Fund. Such guidelines and standards shall be based on
nationally recognized standards for problem gamblers assistance programs.

(4) In addition, the committee shall develop recommendations regarding
(a) the evaluation and approval process for provider applications and contracts
for treatment funding from the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, (b) the
review and use of evaluation data, (c) the use and expenditure of funds for
education regarding problem gambling and prevention of problem gambling, and
(d) the creation and implementation of outreach and educational programs regarding
problem gambling for Nebraska residents. The committee may engage in other
activities it finds necessary to carry out its duties under this section.

(5) Based on the recommendations of the committee, the division shall
adopt guidelines and standards for the distribution and disbursement of money
in the fund and for administration of problem gambling services in Nebraska.

(6) The division and the committee shall jointly submit a report within
sixty days after the end of each fiscal year to the Legislature and the Governor
that provides details of the administration of services and distribution of
funds. The report submitted
to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 551, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 95;

Laws 2008, LB1058, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB189, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 106.